waterfox/browser/locales/lt/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/lt.aff
SFX Q us      ėlesniaisiais   us
SFX Q us      ėlesniuosiuose  us
SFX Q as      ėlesniosioms    [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesniąsias     [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesniosiomis   [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesniosiose    [^i]as
SFX Q ias     ėlesniosioms    [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesniąsias     [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesniosiomis   [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesniosiose    [^č]ias
SFX Q čias    tėlesniosioms   čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesniąsias    čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesniosiomis  čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesniosiose   čias
SFX Q us      ėlesniosioms    us
SFX Q us      ėlesniąsias     us
SFX Q us      ėlesniosiomis   us
SFX Q us      ėlesniosiose    us
SFX Q as      iausias         [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausio          [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiam         [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausią          [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiu          [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiame        [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      žiausias        das
SFX Q as      žiausio         das
SFX Q as      žiausiam        das
SFX Q as      žiausią         das
SFX Q as      žiausiu         das
SFX Q as      žiausiame       das
SFX Q s       usias           [ij]as
SFX Q s       usio            [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiam           [ij]as
SFX Q s       usią            [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiu            [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiame          [ij]as
SFX Q tas     čiausias        tas
SFX Q tas     čiausio         tas
SFX Q tas     čiausiam        tas
SFX Q tas     čiausią         tas
SFX Q tas     čiausiu         tas
SFX Q tas     čiausiame       tas
SFX Q us      iausias         [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausio          [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiam         [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausią          [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiu          [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiame        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      žiausias        dus
SFX Q us      žiausio         dus
SFX Q us      žiausiam        dus
SFX Q us      žiausią         dus
SFX Q us      žiausiu         dus
SFX Q us      žiausiame       dus
SFX Q us      ausias          jus
SFX Q us      ausio           jus
SFX Q us      ausiam          jus
SFX Q us      ausią           jus
SFX Q us      ausiu           jus
SFX Q us      ausiame         jus
SFX Q tus     čiausias        tus
SFX Q tus     čiausio         tus
SFX Q tus     čiausiam        tus
SFX Q tus     čiausią         tus
SFX Q tus     čiausiu         tus
SFX Q tus     čiausiame       tus
SFX Q as      iausia          [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausios         [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiai         [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausioje        [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      žiausia         das
SFX Q as      žiausios        das
SFX Q as      žiausiai        das
SFX Q as      žiausioje       das
SFX Q s       usia            [ij]as
SFX Q s       usios           [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiai           [ij]as
SFX Q s       usioje          [ij]as
SFX Q tas     čiausia         tas
SFX Q tas     čiausios        tas
SFX Q tas     čiausiai        tas
SFX Q tas     čiausioje       tas
SFX Q us      iausia          [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausios         [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiai         [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausioje        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      žiausia         dus
SFX Q us      žiausios        dus
SFX Q us      žiausiai        dus
SFX Q us      žiausioje       dus
SFX Q us      ausia           jus
SFX Q us      ausios          jus
SFX Q us      ausiai          jus
SFX Q us      ausioje         jus
SFX Q tus     čiausia         tus
SFX Q tus     čiausios        tus
SFX Q tus     čiausiai        tus
SFX Q tus     čiausioje       tus
SFX Q as      iausi           [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausių          [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiems        [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausius         [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiais        [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiuose       [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      žiausi          das
SFX Q as      žiausių         das
SFX Q as      žiausiems       das
SFX Q as      žiausius        das
SFX Q as      žiausiais       das
SFX Q as      žiausiuose      das
SFX Q s       usi             [ij]as
SFX Q s       usių            [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiems          [ij]as
SFX Q s       usius           [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiais          [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiuose         [ij]as
SFX Q tas     čiausi          tas
SFX Q tas     čiausių         tas
SFX Q tas     čiausiems       tas
SFX Q tas     čiausius        tas
SFX Q tas     čiausiais       tas
SFX Q tas     čiausiuose      tas
SFX Q us      iausi           [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausių          [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiems        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausius         [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiais        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiuose       [^djt]us
SFX Q us      žiausi          dus
SFX Q us      žiausių         dus
SFX Q us      žiausiems       dus
SFX Q us      žiausius        dus
SFX Q us      žiausiais       dus
SFX Q us      žiausiuose      dus
SFX Q us      ausi            jus
SFX Q us      ausių           jus
SFX Q us      ausiems         jus
SFX Q us      ausius          jus
SFX Q us      ausiais         jus
SFX Q us      ausiuose        jus
SFX Q tus     čiausi          tus
SFX Q tus     čiausių         tus
SFX Q tus     čiausiems       tus
SFX Q tus     čiausius        tus
SFX Q tus     čiausiais       tus
SFX Q tus     čiausiuose      tus
SFX Q as      iausioms        [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiomis       [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiose        [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      žiausioms       das
SFX Q as      žiausiomis      das
SFX Q as      žiausiose       das
SFX Q s       usioms          [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiomis         [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiose          [ij]as
SFX Q tas     čiausioms       tas
SFX Q tas     čiausiomis      tas
SFX Q tas     čiausiose       tas
SFX Q us      iausioms        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiomis       [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiose        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      žiausioms       dus
SFX Q us      žiausiomis      dus
SFX Q us      žiausiose       dus
SFX Q us      ausioms         jus
SFX Q us      ausiomis        jus
SFX Q us      ausiose         jus
SFX Q tus     čiausioms       tus
SFX Q tus     čiausiomis      tus
SFX Q tus     čiausiose       tus
SFX Q as      iausiasis       [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiojo        [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiajam       [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiąjį        [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiuoju       [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiajame      [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      žiausiasis      das
SFX Q as      žiausiojo       das
SFX Q as      žiausiajam      das
SFX Q as      žiausiąjį       das
SFX Q as      žiausiuoju      das
SFX Q as      žiausiajame     das
SFX Q s       usiasis         [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiojo          [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiajam         [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiąjį          [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiuoju         [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiajame        [ij]as
SFX Q tas     čiausiasis      tas
SFX Q tas     čiausiojo       tas
SFX Q tas     čiausiajam      tas
SFX Q tas     čiausiąjį       tas
SFX Q tas     čiausiuoju      tas
SFX Q tas     čiausiajame     tas
SFX Q us      iausiasis       [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiojo        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiajam       [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiąjį        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiuoju       [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiajame      [^djt]us
SFX Q us      žiausiasis      dus
SFX Q us      žiausiojo       dus
SFX Q us      žiausiajam      dus
SFX Q us      žiausiąjį       dus
SFX Q us      žiausiuoju      dus
SFX Q us      žiausiajame     dus
SFX Q us      ausiasis        jus
SFX Q us      ausiojo         jus
SFX Q us      ausiajam        jus
SFX Q us      ausiąjį         jus
SFX Q us      ausiuoju        jus
SFX Q us      ausiajame       jus
SFX Q tus     čiausiasis      tus
SFX Q tus     čiausiojo       tus
SFX Q tus     čiausiajam      tus
SFX Q tus     čiausiąjį       tus
SFX Q tus     čiausiuoju      tus
SFX Q tus     čiausiajame     tus
SFX Q as      iausioji        [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiosios      [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiajai       [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiąją        [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiąja        [^dijt]as
