waterfox/browser/locales/lt/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/lt.dic
abėcėliškas/BNQ
aikštingas/BNQ
akiniuotas/BNQ
aksomiškas/BNQ
alavingas/BNQ
alpus/BNQ
ambivalentiškas/BNQ
anglinas/BNQ
ankštėtas/BNQ
antiškas/BNQ
apgaulus/BNQ
apolitiškas/BNQ
apverktinas/BNQ
ardus/BNQ
asiliškas/BNQ
atgaivingas/BNQ
atkilas/BNQ
atmainus/BNQ
atsijas/BNQ
atveikus/BNQ
audringas/BNQ
aukštininkas/BNQ
avižotas/BNQ
badus/BNQ
balsingas/BNQ
banguotas/BNQ
baugus/BNQ
bengališkas/BNQ
betvarkiškas/BNQ
blaivas/BNQ
blukus/BNQ
brankus/BNQ
bruzgus/BNQ
bėdinas/BNQ
chemiškas/BNQ
dabnus/BNQ
daktariškas/BNQ
darbingas/BNQ
darus/BNQ
debesingas/BNQ
delikatus/BNQ
dervuotas/BNQ
didus/BNQ
dinamiškas/BNQ
diskursiškas/BNQ
dosnus/BNQ
draugingas/BNQ
drovus/BNQ
druskuotas/BNQ
drūtas/BNQ
dulsvas/BNQ
duonuotas/BNQ
dvasiškas/BNQ
dviveidiškas/BNQ
dėkingas/BNQ
džinsuotas/BNQ
eiklus/BNQ
ekspresyvus/BNQ
elegantiškas/BNQ
entuziastingas/BNQ
erzlus/BNQ
eventualus/BNQ
feljetoniškas/BNQ
fotografiškas/BNQ
gaisruotas/BNQ
galeganiškas/BNQ
garankštėtas/BNQ
garsingas/BNQ
gedulingas/BNQ
gelumbėtas/BNQ
gervinas/BNQ
gintaringas/BNQ
glebnas/BNQ
glotnas/BNQ
godus/BNQ
gramatiškas/BNQ
greblas/BNQ
griozdiškas/BNQ
grumstuotas/BNQ
grūdėtas/BNQ
guzuotas/BNQ
gyvybiškas/BNQ
hermetiškas/BNQ
ikringas/BNQ
impulsyvus/BNQ
inkštiruotas/BNQ
intymus/BNQ
itališkas/BNQ
išganus/BNQ
iškišas/BNQ
išnašus/BNQ
ištakus/BNQ
išžargas/BNQ
jaurus/BNQ
juntamas/BNQ
juslus/BNQ
kaimyniškas/BNQ
kaliošuotas/BNQ
kalvotas/BNQ
kanapėtas/BNQ
kardinalus/BNQ
karštligiškas/BNQ
kategoriškas/BNQ
keistas/BNQ
kelmuotas/BNQ
kerėpliškas/BNQ
kiauliškas/BNQ
kilmingas/BNQ
kiprietiškas/BNQ
klaidus/BNQ
kleivas/BNQ
klotingas/BNQ
kniūbsčias/BNQ
kolosalus/BNQ
konceptualus/BNQ
kontrastingas/BNQ
kosulingas/BNQ
kratus/BNQ
krekus/BNQ
krovus/BNQ
kryžmiškas/BNQ
kuokštuotas/BNQ
kuršiškas/BNQ
kūdas/BNQ
labas/BNQ
laipsniškas/BNQ
lakoniškas/BNQ
lapuotas/BNQ
ledinuotas/BNQ
lengvas/BNQ
liberalus/BNQ
ligotas/BNQ
lipus/BNQ
lojalus/BNQ
luošas/BNQ
lygstamas/BNQ
magus/BNQ
maldingas/BNQ
mankštus/BNQ
masiškas/BNQ
mauruotas/BNQ
meduotas/BNQ
melodingas/BNQ
metališkas/BNQ
mielėtas/BNQ
miltinas/BNQ
mintrus/BNQ
modalus/BNQ
mokytas/BNQ
moralus/BNQ
murus/BNQ
mėgėjiškas/BNQ
mįslingas/BNQ
naivus/BNQ
naudingas/BNQ
nebylus/BQ
nekilnojamas/BNQ
nepagydomas/BNQ
nervingas/BNQ
neįveikiamas/BNQ
niežuotas/BNQ
nižus/BNQ
nosingas/BNQ
nuodėmingas/BNQ
nuolaidus/BNQ
nuostabus/BNQ
nuoširdus/BNQ
obskurantiškas/BNQ
opus/BNQ
ožiuotas/BNQ
pagalbus/BNQ
pagoniškas/BNQ
paišinas/BNQ
pakantus/BNQ
pakuliškas/BNQ
pamaldus/BNQ
paplaišotas/BNQ
parazitiškas/BNQ
pasakiškas/BNQ
pasipūtėliškas/BNQ
paslikas/BNQ
pasėdus/BNQ
patriarchališkas/BNQ
pavasaringas/BNQ
pavydėtinas/BNQ
pašnekus/BNQ
pedantiškas/BNQ
penkialinkas/BNQ
permatomas/BNQ
pieningas/BNQ
piktas/BNQ
piltuviškas/BNQ
pirmas/BNQ
platus/BNQ
plitus/BNQ
pluoštingas/BNQ
poetiškas/BNQ
portatyvus/BNQ
pragariškas/BNQ
pralaidus/BNQ
prantnus/BNQ
pravažus/BNQ
preciziškas/BNQ
priekabus/BNQ
prievartus/BNQ
priežastiškas/BNQ
priprastas/BNQ
priverčiamas/BNQ
proporcionalus/BNQ
provokatoriškas/BNQ
puolus/BNQ
pusiausviras/BNQ
puvus/BNQ
pūlingas/BNQ
raidiškas/BNQ
raiškus/BNQ
rantytas/BNQ
raumenuotas/BNQ
raštiškas/BNQ
reikalingas/BNQ
retoriškas/BNQ
riebus/BNQ
riteriškas/BNQ
rumuniškas/BNQ
rėkus/BNQ
sakingas/BNQ
sargus/BNQ
savaveiksmiškas/BNQ
seklus/BNQ
siauraprotiškas/BNQ
simboliškas/BNQ
skaistus/BNQ
skeptiškas/BNQ
skriaudus/BNQ
skėtiškas/BNQ
slėnus/BNQ
smiltuotas/BNQ
sniegingas/BNQ
sparnuotas/BNQ
sprangus/BNQ
sriegiuotas/BNQ
status/BNQ
stovus/BNQ
sultingas/BNQ
sušnekamas/BNQ
svogūniškas/BNQ
taiklus/BNQ
tarmiškas/BNQ
technologizuotas/BNQ
tepus/BNQ
tingus/BNQ
tolygus/BNQ
trenksmingas/BNQ
trumpas/BNQ
tvanus/BNQ
tįsus/BNQ
uogingas/BNQ
utopiškas/BNQ
vabaluotas/BNQ
vaizdingas/BNQ
valiūkiškas/BNQ
vargingas/BNQ
vaškiškas/BNQ
velnioniškas/BNQ
verslininkiškas/BNQ
vidutiniškas/BNQ
vienopas/BNQ
vilniškas/BNQ
virškus/BNQ
vočiuotas/BNQ
vėlyvas/BNQ
ąsotas/BNQ
įdėmus/BNQ
įmanus/BNQ
įtaigus/BNQ
įvardiškas/BNQ
šališkas/BNQ
šerdingas/BNQ
šienuotas/BNQ
šiurpus/BNQ
šnekus/BNQ
šventadieniškas/BNQ
ūkiškas/BNQ
žalingas/BNQ
žeminas/BNQ
žindus/BNQ
žolingas/BNQ
žvirgžduotas/BNQ
